apertium-cs-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="spolupr/áce__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áce</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áce</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áci</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áci</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áci</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áci</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áce</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áce</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ací</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>acím</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áce</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>acemi</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>acích</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áce</l>
        <r>áce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__liga">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ga</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ze</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gu</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ze</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>go</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>g</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gám</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gami</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gách</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="li/ga__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ga<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__liga"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dr/áha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áha</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áhy</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áze</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áhu</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áhou</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ahou</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áze</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áho</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áhy</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áh</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áhám</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ahám</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áhy</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áhami</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ahami</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áhách</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ahách</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áhy</l>
        <r>áha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="obyvatelst/vo__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vo</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>va</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vu</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vo</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vem</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vu</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vo</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>va</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ev</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vům</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>va</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vy</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vech</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>va</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="božstvo"><i>božst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="draga"><i>dra</i><par n="li/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="droga"><i>dro</i><par n="li/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuga"><i>fu</i><par n="li/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dráha"><i>dr</i><par n="dr/áha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="družstvo"><i>družst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dělostřelectvo"><i>dělostřelect</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="letectvo"><i>letect</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liga"><i>li</i><par n="li/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lidstvo"><i>lidst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ministerstvo"><i>ministerst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obecenstvo"><i>obecenst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obyvatelstvo"><i>obyvatelst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potomstvo"><i>potomst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ptactvo"><i>ptact</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="příbuzenstvo"><i>příbuzenst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="společenstvo"><i>společenst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spolupráce"><i>spolupr</i><par n="spolupr/áce__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svalstvo"><i>svalst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svinstvo"><i>svinst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bratrstvo"><i>bratrst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="námořnictvo"><i>námořnict</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="synagoga"><i>synago</i><par n="li/ga__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sága"><i>sá</i><par n="li/ga__n"/></e>
